Vermont, session 2025-2026, H686.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2 V.S.A. § 261 is amended to read:
§ 261. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(9) “Lobby” or “lobbying” means:
(A) to communicate orally or in writing with any legislator or
administrative official for the purpose of influencing legislative or
administrative action;
(B) solicitation of others to influence legislative or administrative
action;
(C) an attempt to obtain the goodwill of a legislator or administrative
official by communications or activities with that legislator or administrative
official intended ultimately to influence legislative or administrative action; or
(D) activities sponsored by an employer or lobbyist on behalf of or
for the benefit of the members of an interest group, if a principal purpose of the
activity is to enable such members to communicate orally with one or more
legislators or administrative officials for the purpose of influencing legislative
or administrative action or to obtain their goodwill.
* * *
VT LEG #390247 v.1

No. 154 Page 2 of 4
2026
Sec. 2. 2 V.S.A. § 264c is amended to read:
§ 264c. IDENTIFICATION IN AND REPORT OF CERTAIN LOBBYING
ADVERTISEMENTS
(a) Identification.
(1) An advertisement that is intended, designed, or calculated to
influence legislative action or to solicit others to influence legislative action
and that is made at any time prior to final adjournment of a biennial or
adjourned legislative session shall contain the name of any lobbyist, lobbying
firm, or lobbyist employer that made an expenditure for the advertisement and
language that the advertisement was paid for, or paid in part, by the lobbyist,
lobbying firm, or lobbyist employer; provided, however:
* * *
(b) Report.
(1) In addition to any other reports required to be filed under this
chapter, a lobbyist, lobbying firm, or lobbyist employer shall file an
advertisement report with the Secretary of State if he, she, or it makes an
expenditure or expenditures:
(A) for any advertisement that is described in subsection (a) of this
section and that has a cost totaling $1,000.00 or more; or
(B) for any advertising campaign that contains advertisements
described in subsection (a) of this section and that has a cost totaling $1,000.00
or more.
VT LEG #390247 v.1

No. 154 Page 3 of 4
2026
(2) The report shall be made for each advertisement or advertising
campaign described in subdivision (1) of this subsection and shall identify:
(A) the lobbyist, lobbying firm, or lobbyist employer that made the
expenditure;
(B) the amount and date of the expenditure and to whom it was paid;
and
(C) a brief description of the advertisement or advertising campaign,
including:
(i) any enacted or introduced bill or any issue featured in the
advertisement or advertising campaign;
(ii) any specific person featured in the advertisement or
advertising campaign; and
(iii) whether the intent or content in the advertisement or
advertising campaign offers an opinion of support, opposition, or neutrality on
a bill, issue, or person.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, an advertisement
report need not be filed if the lobbyist, lobbying firm, or lobbyist employer has
already filed the necessary reports and disclosures required under 17 V.S.A.
chapter 61, subchapter 4, for the same advertisement or advertisement
campaign.
(c) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #390247 v.1

No. 154 Page 4 of 4
2026
(1) “Advertisement” means a notice that appears in any of the following
public media: radio, television, newspapers or other periodicals, or internet
websites.
(2) “Advertising campaign” means advertisements substantially similar
in nature, regardless of the media in which they are placed.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390247 v.1